Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-421
Combination hunting, fur-harvesting, and fishing permits; stamps; persons eligible; one-day permits and stamps for veterans; special permits, limitation.

(1)(a) The commission may issue an annual combination fishing, fur-harvesting, and hunting permit, habitat stamp, aquatic habitat stamp, and Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamp upon application and payment of a fee of five dollars to (i) any Nebraska resident who is a veteran, who is sixty-four years of age or older, and who was discharged or separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions) or (ii) any Nebraska resident who is sixty-nine years of age or older.

(b) A permit issued as provided in this subsection shall expire as provided in subdivision (3)(a) of section 37-405. Permits issued under this section as it existed before January 1, 2006, shall not expire as provided in section 37-405.

(2) The commission shall issue a one-day hunting permit, habitat stamp, and Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamp upon application and without payment of any fee to any veteran who is a Nebraska resident who was discharged or separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions) for use on Veterans Day. A permit and stamps issued under this subsection shall only be valid on November 11 in the year in which such permit and stamps are issued.

(3) If disabled persons are unable by reason of physical infirmities to hunt and fish in the normal manner, the commission may issue special permits without cost to those persons to hunt and fish from a vehicle, but such permits shall not authorize any person to shoot from any public highway.

(4) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

Laws 1972, LB 1204, § 6;

Laws 1973, LB 138, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 79, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 434, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-214.04;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 131;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 227, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB867, § 5.